spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.aff
SFX A Y 1604
SFX A   o    óéért        o
SFX A   o    óévá         o
SFX A   o    óéval        o
SFX A   o    óéul         o
SFX A   o    óétól        o
SFX A   o    óét          o
SFX A   o    óéról        o
SFX A   o    óéra         o
SFX A   o    óénál        o
SFX A   o    óénak        o
SFX A   o    óén          o
SFX A   o    óékéért      o
SFX A   o    óékévá       o
SFX A   o    óékéval      o
SFX A   o    óékéul       o
SFX A   o    óékétól      o
SFX A   o    óékét        o
SFX A   o    óékéról      o
SFX A   o    óékért       o
SFX A   o    óékéra       o
SFX A   o    óékénál      o
SFX A   o    óékénak      o
SFX A   o    óékén        o
SFX A   o    óékéig       o
SFX A   o    óékéhoz      o
SFX A   o    óékéból      o
SFX A   o    óékéban      o
SFX A   o    óékéba       o
SFX A   o    óéké         o
SFX A   o    óékul        o
SFX A   o    óéktól       o
SFX A   o    óékról       o
SFX A   o    óékra        o
SFX A   o    óékon        o
SFX A   o    óéknál       o
SFX A   o    óéknak       o
SFX A   o    óékká        o
SFX A   o    óékkal       o
SFX A   o    óékig        o
SFX A   o    óékhoz       o
SFX A   o    óékból       o
SFX A   o    óékban       o
SFX A   o    óékba        o
SFX A   o    óékat        o
SFX A   o    óék          o
SFX A   o    óéig         o
SFX A   o    óéhoz        o
SFX A   o    óéból        o
SFX A   o    óéban        o
SFX A   o    óéba         o
SFX A   o    óé           o
SFX A   o    ótokéért     o
SFX A   o    ótokévá      o
SFX A   o    ótokéval     o
SFX A   o    ótokéul      o
SFX A   o    ótokétól     o
SFX A   o    ótokét       o
SFX A   o    ótokéról     o
SFX A   o    ótokért      o
SFX A   o    ótokéra      o
SFX A   o    ótokénál     o
SFX A   o    ótokénak     o
SFX A   o    ótokén       o
SFX A   o    ótokéig      o
SFX A   o    ótokéhoz     o
SFX A   o    ótokéból     o
SFX A   o    ótokéban     o
SFX A   o    ótokéba      o
SFX A   o    ótoké        o
SFX A   o    ótokul       o
SFX A   o    ótoktól      o
SFX A   o    ótokról      o
SFX A   o    ótokra       o
SFX A   o    ótokon       o
SFX A   o    ótoknál      o
SFX A   o    ótoknak      o
SFX A   o    ótokként     o
SFX A   o    ótokká       o
SFX A   o    ótokkor      o
SFX A   o    ótokkal      o
SFX A   o    ótokig       o
SFX A   o    ótokhoz      o
SFX A   o    ótokból      o
SFX A   o    ótokban      o
SFX A   o    ótokba       o
SFX A   o    ótokat       o
SFX A   o    ótok         o
SFX A   o    óstul        o
SFX A   o    ónkéért      o
SFX A   o    ónkévá       o
SFX A   o    ónkéval      o
SFX A   o    ónkéul       o
SFX A   o    ónkétól      o
SFX A   o    ónkét        o
SFX A   o    ónkéról      o
SFX A   o    ónkért       o
SFX A   o    ónkéra       o
SFX A   o    ónkénál      o
SFX A   o    ónként       o
SFX A   o    ónkénak      o
SFX A   o    ónkén        o
SFX A   o    ónkéig       o
SFX A   o    ónkéhoz      o
SFX A   o    ónkéból      o
SFX A   o    ónkéban      o
SFX A   o    ónkéba       o
SFX A   o    ónké         o
SFX A   o    ónkul        o
SFX A   o    ónktól       o
SFX A   o    ónkról       o
SFX A   o    ónkra        o
SFX A   o    ónkon        o
SFX A   o    ónknál       o
SFX A   o    ónknak       o
SFX A   o    ónkként      o
SFX A   o    ónkká        o
SFX A   o    ónkkor       o
SFX A   o    ónkkal       o
SFX A   o    ónkig        o
SFX A   o    ónkhoz       o
SFX A   o    ónkból       o
SFX A   o    ónkban       o
SFX A   o    ónkba        o
SFX A   o    ónkat        o
SFX A   o    ónk          o
SFX A   o    óméért       o
SFX A   o    ómévá        o
SFX A   o    óméval       o
SFX A   o    óméul        o
SFX A   o    ómétól       o
SFX A   o    ómét         o
SFX A   o    óméról       o
SFX A   o    ómért        o
SFX A   o    óméra        o
SFX A   o    óménál       o
SFX A   o    óménak       o
SFX A   o    ómén         o
SFX A   o    ómékéért     o
SFX A   o    ómékévá      o
SFX A   o    ómékéval     o
SFX A   o    ómékéul      o
SFX A   o    ómékétól     o
SFX A   o    ómékét       o
SFX A   o    ómékéról     o
SFX A   o    ómékért      o
SFX A   o    ómékéra      o
SFX A   o    ómékénál     o
SFX A   o    ómékénak     o
SFX A   o    ómékén       o
SFX A   o    ómékéig      o
SFX A   o    ómékéhoz     o
SFX A   o    ómékéból     o
SFX A   o    ómékéban     o
SFX A   o    ómékéba      o
SFX A   o    óméké        o
SFX A   o    ómékul       o
SFX A   o    óméktól      o
SFX A   o    ómékról      o
SFX A   o    ómékra       o
SFX A   o    ómékon       o
SFX A   o    óméknál      o
SFX A   o    óméknak      o
SFX A   o    ómékká       o
SFX A   o    ómékkal      o
SFX A   o    ómékig       o
SFX A   o    ómékhoz      o
SFX A   o    ómékból      o
SFX A   o    ómékban      o
SFX A   o    ómékba       o
SFX A   o    ómékat       o
SFX A   o    ómék         o
SFX A   o    óméig        o
SFX A   o    óméhoz       o
SFX A   o    óméból       o
SFX A   o    óméban       o
SFX A   o    óméba        o
SFX A   o    ómé          o
SFX A   o    ómul         o
SFX A   o    ómtól        o
SFX A   o    ómról        o
SFX A   o    ómra         o
SFX A   o    ómon         o
SFX A   o    ómnál        o
SFX A   o    ómnak        o
SFX A   o    ómmá         o
SFX A   o    ómmal        o
SFX A   o    ómként       o
SFX A   o    ómkor        o
SFX A   o    ómig         o
SFX A   o    ómhoz        o
SFX A   o    ómból        o
SFX A   o    ómban        o
SFX A   o    ómba         o
SFX A   o    ómat         o
SFX A   o    óm           o
SFX A   o    ókéért       o
SFX A   o    ókévá        o
SFX A   o    ókéval       o
SFX A   o    ókéul        o
SFX A   o    ókétól       o
SFX A   o    ókét         o
SFX A   o    ókéról       o
SFX A   o    ókért        o
SFX A   o    ókéra        o
SFX A   o    ókénál       o
SFX A   o    ókénak       o
SFX A   o    ókén         o
SFX A   o    ókéig        o
SFX A   o    ókéhoz       o
SFX A   o    ókéból       o
SFX A   o    ókéban       o
SFX A   o    ókéba        o
SFX A   o    óké          o
SFX A   o    ókul         o
SFX A   o    óktól        o
SFX A   o    ókról        o
SFX A   o    ókra         o
SFX A   o    ókon         o
SFX A   o    óknál        o
SFX A   o    óknak        o
SFX A   o    ókként       o
SFX A   o    ókká         o
SFX A   o    ókkor        o
SFX A   o    ókkal        o
SFX A   o    ókig         o
SFX A   o    ókhoz        o
SFX A   o    ókból        o
SFX A   o    ókban        o
SFX A   o    ókba         o
SFX A   o    ókat         o
SFX A   o    ók           o
SFX A   o    óiéért       o
SFX A   o    óiévá        o
SFX A   o    óiéval       o
SFX A   o    óiéul        o
SFX A   o    óiétól       o
SFX A   o    óiét         o
SFX A   o    óiéról       o
SFX A   o    óiért        o
SFX A   o    óiéra        o
SFX A   o    óiénál       o
SFX A   o    óiénak       o
SFX A   o    óién         o
SFX A   o    óiéig        o
SFX A   o    óiéhoz       o
SFX A   o    óiéból       o
SFX A   o    óiéban       o
SFX A   o    óiéba        o
SFX A   o    óié          o
SFX A   o    óivá         o
SFX A   o    óival        o
SFX A   o    óiul         o
SFX A   o    óitól        o
SFX A   o    óitokéért    o
SFX A   o    óitokévá     o
SFX A   o    óitokéval    o
SFX A   o    óitokéul     o
SFX A   o    óitokétól    o
SFX A   o    óitokét      o
SFX A   o    óitokéról    o
SFX A   o    óitokért     o
SFX A   o    óitokéra     o
SFX A   o    óitokénál    o
SFX A   o    óitokénak    o
SFX A   o    óitokén      o
SFX A   o    óitokéig     o
SFX A   o    óitokéhoz    o
SFX A   o    óitokéból    o
SFX A   o    óitokéban    o
SFX A   o    óitokéba     o
SFX A   o    óitoké       o
SFX A   o    óitokul      o
SFX A   o    óitoktól     o
SFX A   o    óitokról     o
SFX A   o    óitokra      o
SFX A   o    óitokon      o
SFX A   o    óitoknál     o
SFX A   o    óitoknak     o
SFX A   o    óitokként    o
SFX A   o    óitokká      o
SFX A   o    óitokkor     o
SFX A   o    óitokkal     o
SFX A   o    óitokig      o
SFX A   o    óitokhoz     o
SFX A   o    óitokból     o
