spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.dic
újoncozás/AUKkSYcXD
összehúzódás/AUKykSYcD
őszapóka/AUKQkYcD
óceániai/ADFUQK
élenjárható/ADFUQKX
átdolgozott/ADFUQADFQUX
árnyalandó/ADFUQKX
általánosíthatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
államosíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
ácsolandó/ADFUQKX
Értarcsa/AUKQ
zároltatható/ADFUQKX
zsírtalaníttatható/ADFUQKX
zsinóroztatható/ADFUQKX
zlatóci/ADFUQK
zajgatható/ADFUQKX
vízilabdázás/AUKkSYcXD
vázlatoltató/ADFUQKXY
vámház/AUYc
vágáshutai/ADFUQK
vonogattatható/ADFUQKX
vitáztatott/ADFQUX
visszavonhatatlanság/AUKkSYc
világosodó/ADFUQKXY
vigyázzállás/AUKkSYcD
veszcicai/ADFUQK
vastagság/AUKkSYc
valutáztató/ADFUQKXY
vagány/AUKkSYcD
uzsonnáztatott/ADFQUX
uhornai/ADFUQK
tónus/AUKkSYcD
tápláltató/ADFUQKXY
turbékoltató/ADFUQKXY
travesztáltatható/ADFUQKX
toporzékolhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
titkosság/AUKkSYc
terrénum/AUKkSYcD
tartár/AUKykQYcD
tanácsos/AUKykSYcDADFUKS
taglóztatás/AUKkSYcXD
sárosdi/ADFUQK
szóhasználat/AUKykSYcD
származék/AUKkSYcD
száguldott/ADFQUX
sztenográfia/AUKQkYcD
szobrozhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
szilai/ADFUQK
szelvénylap/AUKykQYcD
szamócáztató/ADFUQKXY
szacharóz/AUKkSYcD
sugaraztató/ADFUQKXY
spiritiszta/AUKQkYcD
sodor/dXOodXAUYc
siklósnagyfalui/ADFUQK
sajóvámosi/ADFUQK
rángatództató/ADFUQKXY
rudlovai/ADFUQK
romlatlan/ADFUKQ
rikkantandó/ADFUQKX
remekíró/AUKQkYcD
ratifikáltató/ADFUQKXY
raboltatás/AUKkSYcXD
párosodó/ADFUQKXY
purgáló/AUKQkYcD
prostituálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
pozsgás/ADFUKS
pongrácfalui/ADFUQK
pletykáztató/ADFUQKXY
pikkelypáfrány/AUKkSYcD
patás/ADFUKS
parcellázott/ADFQUX
palackoztató/ADFUQKXY
orvosoltató/ADFUQKXY
omlasztható/ADFUQKX
okkupálhatóság/AUKkSYcXD
nyúlhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
nyomoríttatás/AUKkSYcXD
nyaraltattatható/ADFUQKX
nemesgáz/AUKkSYcD
nagyobbítandó/ADFUQKX
módosíthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
málévalság/AUKkSYc
mozdony/AUKkSYcD
mondogatott/ADFQUX
mikosszéplaki/ADFUQK
megtaknyosodhatatlanság/AUKkSYcXD
megbunyóztató/ADFUQKXY
markolászó/ADFUQKXY
majré/AUKQkYcD
maceráló/ADFUQKXY
lármázás/AUKkSYcXD
lopódzó/ADFUQKXY
leírás/AUKkSYcD
lehunyódás/AUKkSYcXD
lapátoltatható/ADFUQKX
labdarugó/AUKQykYcD
kóválygás/AUKkSYcD
kátrány/AUKkSYcD
kutatótorony/AUYc
kukorékoltató/ADFUQKXY
kottyanás/AUKkSYcXD
kormánypálca/AUKQykYcD
konverzió/AUKQkYcD
koncsándolyáni/ADFUQK
kollineáció/AUKQkYcD
klappoltatás/AUKkSYcXD
kisigmándi/ADFUQK
kihullott/ADFUQ
kerellőszentpáli/ADFUQK
kartonvászon/AUYc
kapdosás/AUKkSYcXD
kallózható/ADFUQKX
jóslóság/AUKkSYc
jobbágyiújfalusi/ADFUQK
ivogattatható/ADFUQKX
irattározandó/ADFUQKX
ingoványos/ADFUKS
imitálhatatlan/ADFUKQX
iddogáltató/ADFUQKXY
házastársi/UADFUQK
huzigáló/ADFUQKXY
hosszupataki/ADFUQK
homokbucka/AUKQykYcD
hibridizáltatható/ADFUQKX
hatástalaníthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
harcászat/AUKkSYcD
halásztatott/ADFQUX
hajolgattató/ADFUQKXY
görögfalui/ADFUQK
gyógytea/AUKQkYcD
gyalázkodott/ADFQUX
goricai/ADFUQK
generáltatás/AUKkSYcXD
fülöpfalvi/ADFUQK
félsivatag/AUKkSYcD
funkcionárius/AUKkSYcD
forrázott/ADFQUX
folydogálás/AUKkSYcXD
fodrozódó/ADFUQKXY
figuráztatható/ADFUQKX
felsőmocsoládi/ADFUQK
felbolydulható/ADFUQKX
falazandó/ADFUQKX
exkavátor/AUKkQSYcD
emancipáció/AUKQkYcD
elpimaszodó/ADFUQKXY
elforgácsolódható/ADFUQKX
egyfontos/AUKykSYcD
duzzasztandó/ADFUQKX
drágálltatható/ADFUQKX
dobálódott/ADFQUX
diktáló/ADFUQKXY
derogálandó/ADFUQKX
deformált/ADFQUX
cérna/AUKQkYcD
csírátlaníthatóság/AUKkSYcXD
csucsujgatott/ADFQUX
csintalankodás/AUKkSYcXD
cselkószabadjai/ADFUQK
csalhatatlan/ADFUKQXADFUKQ
cicóztatás/AUKkSYcXD
bőrpirosító/AUKQykYcDADFUQK
bántalmazott/ADFQUX
bundázható/ADFUQKX
botorkáztatható/ADFUQKX
bordás/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
bogáncs/AUKkSYcD
bisztricskai/ADFUQK
beslattyogott/ADFQUX
bekalandozhatatlan/ADFUKQX
barom/AUYc
bagi/ADFUQK
aszat/AUKkQYcD
apportíroztató/ADFUQKXY
anarchizmus/AUKkSYcD
alsónádasdi/ADFUQK
alapíttatás/AUKkSYcXD
akadékos/ADFUKS
adogatandó/ADFUQKX
Zeusz/AUKS
Uszod/AUKQ
Tamáslaka/AUKQ
Szilasbalhás/AUKS
Rózsapatak/AUKQ
Pruzsina/AUKQ
Oláhszentmiklós/AUKS
Nagylapos/AUKS
Mákó/AUKQ
Mezőkók/AUKQ
Lippó/AUKQ
Kozsa/AUKQ
Kisbarát/AUKQ
Jakabháza/AUKQ
Henclova/AUKQ
Giróc/AUKS
Felsőlunkoj/AUKS
Draskóc/AUKS
Csernahó/AUKQ
Britannia/AUKQ
Beharóc/AUKS
Alsóstepanó/AUKQ
